District of Columbia statutes.
32-408

Discrimination prohibited.

It shall be unlawful for any employment agency, employment counseling service, employer-paid personnel service, job listing service, or employment counselor to fail or refuse to provide service to any person for any reason based on race, color, religion, national origin, sex, age, marital status, domestic partnership, personal appearance, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, family responsibilities, physical disability, matriculation, or political affiliation. For the purposes of this section, the term “domestic partnership” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 32-701(4).

Mar. 13, 1985, D.C. Law 5-136, § 9, 31 DCR 5727
Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-305, § 46, 53 DCR 6198
June 25, 2008, D.C. Law 17-177, § 17(b), 55 DCR 3696
Sept. 12, 2008, D.C. Law 17-231, § 29, 55 DCR 6758
This section is referenced in § 32-401.
1981 Ed., § 36-1008.
D.C. Law 16-305 substituted “disability” for “handicap”.
D.C. Law 17-177 substituted “sexual orientation, gender identity or expression” for “sexual orientation”.
D.C. Law 17-231 substituted “marital status, domestic partnership,” for “marital status,”; and added the definition of “domestic partnership”.